Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-101.05
Act to be liberally construed.

The Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall be liberally construed to the end that the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State of Nebraska are protected and temperance in the consumption of alcoholic liquor is fostered and promoted by sound and careful control and regulation of the manufacture, sale, and distribution of alcoholic liquor.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 97, p. 427;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-397;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,118;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 53-1,118;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 4.

To comply with legislative policy licensee or agent of corporate licensee must be satisfactory to and approved by the commission with respect to his character. C & L Co. v. Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, 190 Neb. 91, 206 N.W.2d 49 (1973).

It is not the court's duty to read a meaning into a statute not warranted by legislative language. Calvary Baptist Church v. Coonrad, 163 Neb. 25, 77 N.W.2d 821 (1956).

Liquor Control Act is to be liberally construed. Allen v. Tobin, 155 Neb. 212, 51 N.W.2d 338 (1952).

Text of Liquor Control Act evidences legislative interest to authorize adoption of regulations by commission. Griffin v. Gass, 133 Neb. 56, 274 N.W. 193 (1937).